Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB130.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 705.1. Burial benefits.(a) Notice of deceased serviceperson to county.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), a licensed funeral director, funeral entity or cemetery company shall, within 96 hours of receipt of the remains of a deceased serviceperson , notify the county director of veterans affairs of a deceased serviceperson having legal residence in the county at the time of death and p rovide the family of the deceased serviceperson with the contact information for the county director of veterans affairs.(2) Paragraph (1) shall only apply to a cemetery company 123456789101112131415161718 if the cemetery company provides interment for the cremated remains of a deceased serviceperson for whom a licensed funeral director or funeral entity provided no goods or services.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cemetery company." As defined in 9 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions)."Deceased serviceperson." As defined in 16 Pa.C.S. § 15508 (relating to definitions)."Funeral entity." As defined in 49 Pa. Code § 13.1 (relating to definitions)."Licensed funeral director." As defined in 49 Pa. Code § 13.1.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0130PN0079 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516